New York, session 2025-2026, S9590.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph h of subdivision 3 of section 97-v of the state 2 finance law, as added by chapter 659 of the laws of 1983, is amended to 3 read as follows: 4 h. All payments from the IOLA fund shall be made by the state comp- 5 troller upon certification and authorization of the board of trustees of 6 the fund. Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision one of section 7 four of this chapter, or any other law to the contrary, monies may be 8 paid out of such fund in accordance with paragraphs b and c of this 9 subdivision without an appropriation by law. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03321-03-6